DictionaryAnalyser/toy_example/apertium-es-ca/.deps/pgen-ca_valencia.dix
    <pardef n="es">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>s'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>es</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant_menys_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>es<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant_menys_s"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ce</l>
          <r>se<b/>ce</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>ci</l>
          <r>se<b/>ci</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>cé</l>
          <r>se<b/>cé</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>cí</l>
          <r>se<b/>cí</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>cè</l>
          <r>se<b/>cè</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>c</l>
          <r>es<b/>c</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa_menys_ie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>s</l>
          <r>se<b/>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>z</l>
          <r>se<b/>z</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>c</l>
          <r>se<b/>c</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>s</l>
          <r>se<b/>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>s'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general_menys_e"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>se<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant_menys_s_marcat"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>e</l>
          <r>se</r>
        </p>
        <par n="combina_el-els-et-en"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>em<b/></l>
          <r>se</r>
        </p>
        <par n="mi"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>et<b/></l>
          <r>se</r>
        </p>
        <par n="ti"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>ens<b/></l>
          <r>se'ns<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>us<b/></l>
          <r>se<b/>us<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="us">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>us</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>us<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>us<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ens">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>ens</r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>ens<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/></l>
          <r>ens<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="no_apostrofa"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="li">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>li</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>li<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>li<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>el<b/></l>
          <r>li'l<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>el<b/></l>
          <r>li<b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>els<b/></l>
          <r>li'ls<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>els<b/></l>
          <r>els<b/>hi<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>la<b/></l>
          <r>li<b/>l'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>les<b/></l>
          <r>li<b/>les<b/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>en<b/></l>
          <r>li'n<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>en<b/></l>
          <r>li<b/>n'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>en<b/><a/></l>
          <r>li'n<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>h</l>
          <r>li<b/>h</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>en<b/><a/></l>
          <r>li<b/>n'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="en">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>en</r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="consonant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/></l>
          <r>n'</r>
        </p>
        <par n="vocal_general"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>de<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="de"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>per<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="per"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>a<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="a"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>em<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="em"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>et<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="et"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>es<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="es"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>us<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="us"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>ens<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="ens"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>el<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="el"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>els<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="els"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>la<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="la"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>les<b/></l>
          <r>en<b/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="les"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/><a/>h</l>
          <r>n'h</r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>es</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="es"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>us</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="us"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>ens</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="ens"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>li</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="li"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><a/>en</l>
          <r/>
        </p>
        <par n="en"/>
      </e>
